Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 5.
Desertion and Nonsupport.

Research References.

- Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 28 Domestic Actions.
§
28.04 Actions for Support. Friend.

Harrison on Wills & Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Descent and Distribution.
§
3.09 Children and Their Descendants. Cox.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
53, 57; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§§

21, 23, 88; 9B M.J. Illegitimate Children,

§

11; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§

19.

§ 20-61. Desertion or nonsupport of wife, husband or children in necessitous circumstances.

Any spouse who without cause deserts or willfully neglects or refuses or fails to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her spouse, and any parent who deserts or willfully neglects or refuses or fails to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her child under the age of eighteen years of age, or child of whatever age who is crippled or otherwise incapacitated from earning a living, the spouse, child or children being then and there in necessitous circumstances, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding $500, or confinement in jail not exceeding twelve months, or both, or on work release employment as provided in § 53.1-131 for a period of not less than ninety days nor more than twelve months; or in lieu of the fine or confinement being imposed upon conviction by the court or by verdict of a jury he or she may be required by the court to suffer a forfeiture of an amount not exceeding the sum of $1,000 and the fine or forfeiture may be directed by the court to be paid in whole or in part to the spouse, or to the guardian, curator, custodian or trustee of the minor child or children, or to some discreet person or responsible organization designated by the court to receive it. This section shall not apply to the parent of a child of whatever age, if the child qualifies for and is receiving aid under a federal or state program for aid to the permanently and totally disabled; or is an adult and meets the visual requirements for aid to the blind; and for this purpose any state agency shall use only the financial resources of the child of whatever age in determining eligibility; however, such parent is subject to prosecution under this section for the desertion or nonsupport of a spouse or of another child who is not receiving such aid.

(1944, p. 210; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1936; 1950, p. 613; 1954, c. 481; 1960, c. 275; 1966, c. 360; 1970, c. 284; 1972, cc. 460, 845; 1973, cc. 315, 346; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 644; 1976, c. 462; 2010, c. 619.)

Cross references.

- As to liability of spouse for emergency medical care furnished to the other spouse while the spouses are living together, see

§

8.01-220.2.

As to sentence for violation of an order of the juvenile court, see
§
16.1-292.

As to report to State Police that is required upon service of process, see
§
19.2-390.

For provision for sentencing a person to nonconsecutive days in jail upon conviction of an offense under this chapter, see
§
53.1-131.1.

As to punishment in accordance with the provisions of
§
20-61 for failure to support certain children living in same home, see

§

63.2-510.

The 2010 amendments.

- The 2010 amendment by c. 619, in the last sentence, substituted "to the parent of a child" for "to any parent of any child" near the beginning and added "however, such parent is subject to prosecution under this section for the desertion or nonsupport of a spouse or of another child who is not receiving such aid" to the end.

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1520 (1973). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For comment, "The New Doctrine of Necessaries in Virginia," see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 317 (1985).

For note, "Estop in the Name of Love: A Case for Constructive Marriage in Virginia," see 49 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 973 (2007).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

§§ 20-61.1, 20-61.2.

Repealed by Acts 1988, cc. 866, 878.

Cross references.

- For current provisions as to proceedings to determine parentage, see now
§
20-49.1 et seq.

Editor's note.

- Repealed
§
20-61.1 was amended by Acts 1988, c. 782, and repealed

§

20-61.2 was amended by Acts 1988, c. 777.

§ 20-61.3. Consequences of a putative father failing to appear.

If a putative father fails to appear after having been personally served with notice, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 1 of § 8.01-296 or § 8.01-320, alleging that he is the father of a minor child, the court shall proceed in hearing the evidence in the case as provided in Chapter 3.1 (§ 20-49.1 et seq.) of Title 20 as if the putative father were present. The order of the court in any such proceedings shall be served upon the father in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (§ 8.01-285 et seq.) or Chapter 9 (§ 8.01-328 et seq.) of Title 8.01.

(1988, cc. 867, 894; 1994, c. 869.)

§ 20-62. Commitment to workhouse, city farm or work squad for such desertion.

In the event that the cities or counties of this Commonwealth or any of them establish workhouses, city farms or work squads on which prisoners are put to work, persons convicted of nonsupport under the provisions of this chapter may be committed to the farms, workhouses or work squads instead of to jail. Persons sentenced to jail or to a workhouse or city farm under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to do such work as they are capable of in accordance with the opinion of the physician examining such persons pursuant to § 53.1-33 and shall be returned, when released, to the court which exercised original jurisdiction in the case and by that court may be placed on probation upon the terms and conditions and in the manner prescribed by law for probation of original offenders in such cases.

(1944, p. 210; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1936; 1954, c. 481; 1970, c. 630; 1978, c. 377.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 14A M.J. Parent and Child,
§
19.

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-63. Support payments by county or city.

It shall be the duty of the governing body of the county or city within the boundaries of which any work is performed under the provisions of this chapter to allow and order payment at the end of each calendar month, out of the current funds of the county or city, to the Department of Social Services for the support of the prisoner's spouse or child or children, a sum not less than $20 nor more than $40 for each week in the discretion of the court during any part of which any work is so performed by such prisoner.

(1944, p. 211; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1936a; 1954, c. 481; 1958, c. 637; 1966, cc. 120, 437; 1974, c. 464; 1978, c. 586; 2016, c. 220.)

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendment by c. 220 deleted "(a)" at the beginning, substituted "Department of Social Services" for "court which originally sentenced the prisoner," "the prisoner's" for "his or her," and "$20 nor more than $40" for "five nor more than twenty-five dollars"; and deleted "(b) [Repealed.]" at the end.

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-64. Proceedings instituted by petition.

Proceedings under this chapter may be instituted upon petition, verified by oath or affirmation, filed by the spouse or child or by any probation officer or by any state or local law-enforcement officer or by the Department of Social Services upon information received, or by any other person having knowledge of the facts, and the petition shall set forth the facts and circumstances of the case.

(1944, p. 211; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937; 1974, c. 464; 2002, c. 747.)

The 2002 amendments.

- The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted "the Department of Social Services" for "any state or local public welfare officer."

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972).

§ 20-65. Summons or warrant; investigation and hearing.

Upon the filing of such petition the court shall forthwith issue its summons or warrant against the spouse or parent and upon its execution may cause an investigation of the case to be made by a probation officer or other person designated for that purpose who shall report thereon to the court, and thereupon the court shall, upon the return date of the warrant or summons, proceed to determine and hear the case on its merits.

(1944, p. 211; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 557.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-66. Contempt proceedings; trial in absence of defendant.

If the person so summoned fails without reasonable cause to appear as herein required, he or she may be proceeded against as for contempt of court and the court may, (1) proceed with the trial of the case in his or her absence and render such judgment as to it seems right and proper, or (2) continue the case to some future date.

If the trial be proceeded with in the absence of the defendant and judgment of conviction be entered against him or her, he or she may, within thirty days after the judgment of conviction is rendered, make application to the court to have the case reopened, and after due notice to the original complainant, for good cause, the court may reopen the case and enter such judgment or order as is right and proper.

(1944, p. 211; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937a; 1974, c. 464.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-67. Jurisdiction.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be had in the juvenile and domestic relations district courts, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in all cases arising under this chapter, except that any grand jury of any circuit court may indict for desertion and nonsupport in any case wherein the defendant is a fugitive from the Commonwealth, and any defendant so indicted or presented and apprehended may be tried by the court in which the indictment or presentment is found or, in the discretion of the court, referred to the juvenile and domestic relations district court.

(1944, p. 212; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937c; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 644.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly." The funding was not provided.

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court Decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-68. Appeal.

The person accused shall have the same right of appeal as provided by law in other similar cases; provided that any order of court requiring support of a spouse or children shall remain in full force and effect until reversed or modified by judgment of a superior court, and in the interim the order shall be enforceable by the court entering it and the court may punish for violation of the order as for contempt. After the judgment of conviction and entry of order of support from which no appeal is taken the hearing in the appellate court on an appeal from any subsequent order, modification or amendment shall be restricted to the particular matter or order appealed from.

(1944, p. 212; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937c; 1974, c. 464.)

Cross references.

- For statute on general jurisdiction of judges of juvenile courts, see
§
16.1-241.

§ 20-69. Fees of officers.

The officers acting under this chapter shall be entitled to the same fees as are now or hereafter allowed in misdemeanor cases.

(1944, p. 212; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937c; 1974, c. 464.)

§ 20-70. No warrant of arrest to issue.

Except as otherwise in this chapter provided, no warrant of arrest shall be issued by a magistrate against any person within the terms of this chapter, but all proceedings shall be instituted upon petition as aforesaid, provided that upon affidavit of the spouse or other person that there is reasonable cause to believe that the spouse or parent is about to leave the jurisdiction of the court with intent to desert the spouse, child or children, the court of, or any magistrate serving, the city or county may issue a warrant for the spouse or parent returnable before the court.

(1944, p. 211; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1937b; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 644; 2008, cc. 551, 691.)

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical and substituted "the court of, or any magistrate serving, the city" for "the court or any magistrate of the city" near the end.

§ 20-71. Temporary orders for support.

At any time before the trial, upon motion of the complainant, with notice to the defendant, the court may enter such temporary order as seems just, providing for the support of the neglected spouse or children, or both, pendente lite, and may punish for violation of the order as for contempt.

(1944, p. 212; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1938; 1974, c. 464.)

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

Applied

in Estate of Hackler v. Hackler, 44 Va. App. 51, 602 S.E.2d 426 (2004).

§ 20-71.1. Attorneys' fees in proceedings under § 20-71.

In any proceeding by a spouse petitioning under § 20-71 before the juvenile and domestic relations district court or on appeal before a court of record, to be allowed support for himself or herself or the infant child or children of the defendant, the juvenile and domestic relations district court may direct the defendant, in addition to the allowance to the spouse and support and maintenance for the infant children, to pay to the spouse's attorney, upon such terms and conditions and in such time as the court shall deem reasonable, an attorney's fee deemed reasonable by the court for such services as said attorney before said court. Upon appeal of the matter to a court of record, the judge of the circuit court may direct that the defendant, in addition to the fees allowed to the spouse's attorney by the juvenile and domestic relations district court, pay to the spouse's attorney at such time and upon such terms and conditions as the judge deems reasonable, an attorney's fee deemed reasonable by the court for such services of said attorney before said court of record, but in fixing said fee such court shall take into consideration the fee or fees directed to be paid by the court from which said appeal was taken.

(1950, p. 741; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 644.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly." The funding was not provided.

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 14 Costs.
§
14.01 Items included. Bryson.

§ 20-72. Probation on order directing defendant to pay and enter recognizance.

Before the trial, with the consent of the defendant, or at the trial on entry of a plea of guilty, or after conviction, instead of imposing the penalties hereinbefore provided, or in addition thereto, the judge, in his discretion, having regard to the circumstances of the case and to the financial ability or earning capacity of the defendant, shall have the power to make an order, directing the defendant to pay a certain sum or a certain percentage of his or her earnings periodically, either directly or through the court to the spouse or to the guardian, curator or custodian of such minor child or children, or to an organization or individual designated by the court as trustee, and to suspend sentence and release the defendant from custody on probation, upon his or her entering into a recognizance with or without surety, in such sum as the court may order and approve.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 466; 1940, p. 476; 1952, c. 692; 1974, c. 464.)

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 2C M.J. Bail and Recognizance,
§
2; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§

19.

§ 20-73. Condition of the recognizance.

The condition of the recognizance shall be such that if the defendant shall make his or her personal appearance in court upon such date as may be specified by the court, or whenever, in the meantime, he or she may be ordered so to do, and shall further comply with the terms of such order, or any subsequent modification or amendment thereof, then such recognizance shall be void, otherwise in full force and effect.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 466; 1940, p. 477.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-74. Support orders to remain in effect until annulled; modification.

Any order of support or amendment thereof entered under the provisions of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect until annulled by the court of original jurisdiction, or the court to which an appeal may be taken; however, such order of support or terms of probation shall be subject to change or modification by the court from time to time, as circumstances may require, but no such change or modification shall affect or relieve the surety of his or her obligation under such recognizance, provided notice thereof be forthwith given to such surety. No support order may be retroactively modified, but may be modified with respect to any period during which there is a pending petition for modification in any court, but only from the date that notice of such petition has been given to the responding party.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 467; 1940, p. 477; 1975, c. 644; 1987, c. 649; 2004, c. 204.)

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 204 inserted "in any court" in the last sentence.

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-75. Procedure when accused outside territorial jurisdiction.

Whenever the accused is outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court, instead of requiring his or her arrest and personal appearance before the court, the court may allow the accused to accept service of the process or warrant and enter a written plea of guilty. The court may thereupon proceed as if the accused were present and enter such order of support as may be just and proper, requiring the accused to enter into the recognizance hereinbefore mentioned. For the purposes of this chapter the court may authorize the entering into of such recognizance outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court before such official of the place where the accused or his or her surety may be and under such conditions and subject to such stipulations and requirements as the court may direct and approve. The provisions of this chapter as to the entering into of recognizances outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court shall likewise apply to any renewal of any recognizance heretofore or hereafter entered into in any desertion and nonsupport case.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 467; 1940, p. 477; 1975, c. 644.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-76.

Repealed by Acts 1974, c. 464.

§ 20-77. When authority to suspend sentence may be exercised; deduction of certain time from sentence.

The authority of the court to suspend sentences under §§ 20-72 to 20-79 may be exercised at any time after conviction and before the completion of the sentence, and as often as the court may deem advisable and to the best interests of the parties, provided that such period or periods of time as may be actually served by the defendant shall be allowed against and deducted from the original sentence.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 467; 1940, p. 477; 1974, c. 464.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-78. Continuance of failure to support after completion of sentence.

Any person sentenced under §§ 20-72 to 20-79 who, after the completion of such sentence, shall continue in his or her failure, without just cause, adequately to support his or her spouse or children, as the case may be, may again be sentenced on the original petition, as for a new offense, in the same manner and under like conditions as herein provided, and so on from time to time, as often as such failure or failures shall occur.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1932, p. 467; 1940, p. 478; 1974, c. 464.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-78.1. Effect of entry of support order in certain garnishment proceedings.

A judgment for arrearage, or an order or decree of support for a spouse or support and maintenance of a child or children entered under the provisions of this chapter or §§ 16.1-278.15 through 16.1-278.18, 20-103 and 20-107.1 through 20-109 may be enforced in any garnishment proceeding in which the liability is against the United States of America.

Except as otherwise provided herein, the provisions of Article 7 (§ 8.01-511 et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 8.01 shall govern such garnishment. Any garnishment under the provisions of this section shall continue until modified by the issuing court, or in the case of an arrearage, until the sum or sums of money found to be in arrears are paid in full.

The provisions of this section shall apply to arrearages accumulated prior to and after July 1, 1976.

(1976, c. 659; 1978, c. 736; 1980, c. 102; 1987, c. 597; 1991, c. 534; 1999, c. 577.)

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted "A judgment for arrearage, or," deleted "only after arrearage has been reduced to judgment" at the end of the subsection; in subsection B, inserted "modified by the issuing court, or in the case of an arrearage, until," deleted "in the judgment of the court" following "to be in arrears," and deleted "or 180 days have elapsed, whichever first occurs" following "are paid in full."

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

§ 20-78.2. Attorneys' fees and interest on support arrearage.

The entry of an order or decree of support for a spouse or for support and maintenance of a child under the provisions of this chapter or §§ 20-107.1 through 20-109 shall constitute a final judgment for any sum or sums in arrears. This order shall also include an amount for interest on the arrearage at the judgment interest rate as established by § 6.2-302 unless the obligee, in a writing submitted to the court, waives the collection of interest; and may include reasonable attorneys' fees if the total arrearage for support and maintenance, excluding interest, is equal to or greater than three months of support and maintenance.

(1983, c. 488; 1987, c. 190; 1995, c. 483; 2005, c. 880.)

Editor's note.

- Effective October 1, 2010, "

§

6.2-302" was substituted for "

§

6.1-330.54" to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 880 added "and may include reasonable attorneys' fees if the total arrearage for support and maintenance, excluding interest, is equal to or greater than three months of support and maintenance" at the end of the last sentence.

§ 20-79. Effect of divorce proceedings.

In any case where an order has been entered under the provisions of this chapter, directing either party to pay any sum or sums of money for the support of his or her spouse, or concerning the care, custody or maintenance of any child, or children, the jurisdiction of the court which entered such order shall cease and its orders become inoperative upon the entry of a decree by the court or the judge thereof in vacation in a suit for divorce instituted in any circuit court in this Commonwealth having jurisdiction thereof, in which decree provision is made for support and maintenance for the spouse or concerning the care, custody or maintenance of a child or children, or concerning any matter provided in a decree in the divorce proceedings in accordance with the provisions of § 20-103.

In any suit for divorce, the court in which the suit is instituted or pending, when either party to the proceedings so requests, shall provide in its decree for the maintenance, support, care or custody of the child or children in accordance with Chapter 6.1 (§ 20-124.1 et seq.), support and maintenance for the spouse, if the same be sought, and counsel fees and other costs, if in the judgment of the court any or all of the foregoing should be so decreed.

Enforcement of orders. In any suit for divorce or suit for maintenance and support, the court may after a hearing, pendente lite, or in any decree of divorce a mensa et thoro, decree of divorce a vinculo matrimonii, final decree for maintenance and support, or subsequent decree in such suit, transfer to the juvenile and domestic relations district court the enforcement of its orders pertaining to support and maintenance for the spouse, maintenance, support, care and custody of the child or children.

Transfer of case for modification. After the entry of a decree of divorce a vinculo matrimonii the court may transfer to the juvenile and domestic relations district court any other matters pertaining to support and maintenance for the spouse, maintenance, support, care and custody of the child or children on motion by either party, and may so transfer such matters before the entry of such decree on motion joined in by both parties. A court shall not (i) transfer a case for modification to the juvenile and domestic relations district court in the absence of a motion by either party or (ii) require a provision for transfer of matters for modification to the juvenile and domestic relations district court as a condition of entry of a decree of divorce a vinculo matrimonii.

Change of venue. In the transfer of any matters referred to herein, the court may, upon the motion of any party, or on its own motion, and for good cause shown, transfer any matters covered by said decree or decrees to any circuit court or juvenile and domestic relations district court within the Commonwealth that constitutes a more appropriate forum. An appeal of an order by such juvenile and domestic relations district court which is to enforce or modify the decree in the divorce suit shall be as provided in § 16.1-296.

(Code 1919, § 1939; 1940, p. 478; 1960, c. 76; 1964, c. 636; 1970, c. 459; 1974, cc. 464, 473; 1975, c. 644; 1976, c. 345; 1977, c. 71; 1988, c. 502; 1994, c. 769; 2018, c. 254.)

Cross references.

- As to transfer of venue in suits for enforcement of orders pertaining to support, maintenance, care or custody of juvenile, see
§
16.1-243. As to failure to comply with support obligation, see

§

16.1-278.16. As to pendente lite support, see

§

16.1-278.17.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provide that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth." The funding was not provided.

The 2018 amendments.

- The 2018 amendment by c. 254, in subsection (c), added the catch phrase at the beginning of all three paragraphs; in the second paragraph, added the last sentence; in the third paragraph, inserted "circuit court or" in the first full sentence.

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For 1987 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 667 (1987). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 5A M.J. Costs,
§
3; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§§

35, 59, 72.2, 78; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§

17.

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 14 Costs.
§
14.01 Items included. Bryson.

§ 20-79.1. Enforcement of support orders; income deduction; penalty for wrongful discharge.

For the purposes of this section, the terms "employee," "employer," "income," and "independent contractor" shall have the same meanings ascribed to them in § 63.2-1900.

As part of any order directing a person to pay child support, except for initial orders entered pursuant to § 20-79.2, or spousal support pursuant to this chapter or §§ 16.1-278.15 through 16.1-278.18, 20-103, 20-107.2, or 20-109.1, or by separate order at any time thereafter, a court of competent jurisdiction may order a person's employer to deduct from the amounts due or payable to such person, the entitlement to which is based upon income as defined in § 63.2-1900, the amount of current support due and an amount to be applied to arrearages, if any. The court shall order such income deductions (i) if so provided in a stipulation or contract signed by the party ordered to pay such support and filed with the pleadings or depositions, (ii) upon receipt of a notice of arrearages in a case in which an order has been entered pursuant to § 20-60.3, or (iii) upon a finding that the respondent is in arrears for an amount equal to one month's support obligation. The court may, in its discretion, order such payroll deduction (a) on the basis of the obligor's past financial responsibility, history of prior payments pursuant to any such support order, and any other matter that the court considers relevant in determining the likelihood of payment in accordance with the support order or (b) at the request of the obligor.

Any income deduction order shall be entered upon motion and concurrent proper notice sent by the clerk or counsel. The notice shall cite this section. If the notice is sent by the clerk, it shall be served in accordance with the provisions of § 8.01-296 or 8.01-329, or sent by certified mail or by electronic means, including facsimile transmission, to the employer. An employer paying wages or other income subject to deduction shall deliver the notice to the person ordered to pay such support.

The income deduction order of the court shall by its terms direct the clerk to issue an order in accordance with § 20-79.3 to any employer and, if required, to each future employer, as necessary to implement the order. The order shall cite this section as authority for the entry of the order.

The rights and responsibilities of employers with respect to income deduction orders are set out in § 20-79.3.

The order to the employer pursuant to this section shall be effective when a certified copy thereof has been served upon or sent to the employer by electronic means, including facsimile transmission. A copy shall be provided to the employee or independent contractor by the employer. If the employer is a corporation, such service shall be accomplished as is provided in § 8.01-513.

Any order issued pursuant to this section shall be promptly terminated or modified, as appropriate, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing for the parties when (i) the whereabouts of the children entitled to support and their custodian become unknown, or (ii) the support obligation to an obligee ceases. Any such order shall be promptly modified, as appropriate, when arrearages have been paid in full.

The Department of Social Services may charge an obligee an appropriate fee when complying with an order entered under this section sufficient to cover the Department's cost.

If a court of competent jurisdiction in any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia has ordered a person to pay child support, a court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth, upon motion, notice, and opportunity for a hearing as provided in this section, shall enter an income deduction order, conforming with § 20-79.3 as provided in this section. The rights and responsibilities of the employer with respect to the order are set out in § 20-79.3. Similar orders of the courts of the Commonwealth may be enforced in a similar manner in such other state, territory, or district.

If the employee is not an independent contractor, the court or clerk shall attempt to ascertain the obligor's pay period interval prior to service of the clerk's order. If, after the order is served, the employer replies to the court that the pay period interval in the income deduction order differs from the obligor's pay period interval, the clerk shall convert the single monetary amount in the income deduction order to an equivalent single monetary amount for the obligor's pay period interval pursuant to a formula approved by the Committee on District Courts. The equivalent single monetary amount shall be contained in a new order issued by the clerk and served on the employer and which conforms to § 20-79.3.

If the Department of Social Services or the Department's designee receives payments deducted from income of the obligor pursuant to more than one judicial order or a combination of judicial and administrative orders, the Department or the Department's designee shall first allocate such payments among the obligees under such orders with priority given to payment of the order for current support. Where payments are received pursuant to two or more orders for current support, the Department or the Department's designee shall prorate the payments received on the basis of the amounts due under each such order. Upon satisfaction of any amounts due for current support the Department or the Department's designee shall prorate the remainder of the payments received on the basis of amounts due under any orders for accrued arrearages.

The notice shall advise the obligor (i) of the amount proposed to be withheld; (ii) that the order of the court will apply to current and future income; (iii) of the right to contest the order; (iv) that the obligor must file a written notice of contest of such deduction with the court within 10 days of the date of issuance of the notice; (v) that if the notice is contested, a hearing will be held and a decision rendered within 10 days from the receipt of the notice of contest by the court, unless good cause is shown for additional time, which shall in no event exceed 45 days from receipt of the notice by the obligor; (vi) that only disputes as to mistakes of fact as defined in § 63.2-1900 will be heard; (vii) that any order for income deduction entered will state when the deductions will start and the information that will be provided to the person's employer; and (viii) that payment of overdue support upon receipt of the notice shall not be a bar to the implementation of withholding.

Whenever the obligor and the obligee agree to income deductions in a contract or stipulation, the obligor shall be deemed to have waived notice as required in this subsection and the deduction shall be ordered only upon the stipulation or contract being approved by the court.

(1982, c. 298; 1983, c. 481; 1985, c. 488; 1986, c. 594; 1987, cc. 658, 706; 1988, c. 906; 1990, c. 896; 1991, c. 534; 1997, cc. 648, 663; 1998, c. 727; 2018, c. 707; 2020, c. 722.)

Cross references.

- As to priority of orders to withhold and deliver property incident to support orders, see
§
63.2-1929.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2020, c. 722, cl. 3 provides: "That nothing in this act shall be construed to define or redefine 'independent contractor' under the common law or for any purpose other than the withholding of income of an independent contractor for the payment of a support obligation."

The 2018 amendments.

- The 2018 amendment by c. 707, in subsection A, inserted a comma following "
§
20-79.2" in the first sentence and redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) as clauses (a) and (b) in the fourth sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 722 inserted a new subsection A and redesignated accordingly; in subsection B, deleted "The terms 'employer' and 'income' shall have the meanings prescribed in
§
63.2-1900" following the first sentence and substituted "on the basis of" for "based on" and "that" for "which" in the last sentence; in subsection C, inserted "or other income" in the first paragraph in the last sentence; in subsection F, inserted "or independent contractor" in the penultimate sentence; in subsection J, substituted "If the employee is not an independent contractor, the" for "The" in the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 14A M.J. Parent and Child,
§
4.